North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-06 Revised Uniform Law Notarial Acts [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6]

44-06-01.
Appointment and qualification of notaries public. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-02.
Commission — Record — Fee — Notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-03.
Oath and bond of notary public — Approval of bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-03.1.
Notice by surety to secretary of state of claim against bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-04.
Filing of oath, bond, and impression of notarial seal — Requirements of seal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-04.1.
Name change. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-05.
Vacancy — Disposition of records and seals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-06.
Duty of notary as to protested instrument. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-07.
Service of notice by notary public. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-08.
Record of notices — Certified copy — Competent evidence. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-09.
Secretary of state — Preservation of records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-10.
Removal from county — Requirements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1955, ch. 286, § 1.

44-06-11.
Revocation of notary commission — Notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-12.
Notary public commission — Venue — Date of expiration — Form of jurat. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-13.
Acting as notary when disqualified — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-13.1.
Prohibited acts — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-13.2.
Disciplinary proceedings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.

44-06-14.
Fees to be charged for notarial acts — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 6.